Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 1

Metropolitan Government—General Provisions

7-1-101. Definitions — Chapters 1-6.

As used in chapters 1-6 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“City governing body” means the city council or other public agency possessing power and authority usually possessed by a city council;

“County governing body” means that body in a particular county that is vested with the power to levy property taxes;

“General services district” means a service district within a metropolitan government whose geographical limits are coextensive with the total area in which the government functions;

“Metropolitan government” means the political entity created by consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the political and corporate functions of a county and a city or cities;

“Metropolitan government charter commission” or “charter commission” means a commission established to propose to the voters for adoption the charter for a metropolitan government;

“Municipal corporation” means an incorporated city or town;

“Principal city” means:

That municipal corporation having the largest population of any municipality in a particular county; or

If the municipal corporation having the largest population of any municipality in a county fails to adopt a consolidation resolution within ninety (90) days of the county's adoption of a consolidation resolution, the county seat of that county, if the county seat is an incorporated municipality;

“Smaller city” means any municipal corporation other than the principal city; and

“Urban services district” means a service district within a metropolitan government in which are furnished by the metropolitan government municipal services additional to those provided in the general services district.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 1; 1977, ch. 453, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3701; Acts 2019, ch. 314, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (7)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 314, § 2. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Athletic competition leave, title 8, ch. 50, part 11.

Recording of deeds where metropolitan government effective, §§66-24-113,66-24-114.

Transportation systems, ownership authorized, title 7, ch. 56.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, §§ 11, 22; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2, 3.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1964 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1103 (1965).

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Voting under the Metropolitan Government Act, OAG 97-096, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/1/97).

Voting on metropolitan planning organization, OAG 00-015, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (1/26/00).

Voting under Charter Government Unification Act and Metropolitan Government Act. OAG 10-51, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/15/10).

Annexation under metropolitan form of government. OAG 10-109, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (10/28/10).

7-1-102. Legislative purpose and intent — Construction — Continuation of local functions and powers.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent and purpose of chapters 1-3 of this title to provide for the consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the governmental and corporate functions now or hereafter vested in municipal corporations with the governmental and corporate functions now or hereafter vested in the counties in which such municipal corporations are located, and to provide for the creation of metropolitan governments, which may be used to fulfill the unique and urgent needs of a modern metropolitan area.

Chapters 1-3 of this title are hereby declared to be remedial legislation to be liberally construed as a utilization of the constitutional power granted by Amendment No. 8 to article XI, § 9 of the Constitution of Tennessee approved at an election on November 3, 1953.

After consolidation of a county and a municipal corporation or corporations under § 7-1-103, no functions of the governing bodies of the county and the municipal corporation, or of the officers thereof, shall be retained and continued, unless chapters 1-3 of this title or the charter of the metropolitan government expressly so provide, or unless such retention and continuation are required by the Constitution of Tennessee. After the consolidation, no officer or agency of the county or of the municipal corporation shall retain any right, power, duty or obligation, unless chapters 1-3 of this title or the charter of the metropolitan government expressly so provide, or unless such retention and continuation are required by the Constitution of Tennessee.

Any municipal corporation that lies in two (2) or more counties, except those in counties excluded in § 7-1-112(d), may consolidate with the county in which the majority of its territory lies.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3702; Acts 1988, ch. 911, § 1.

Cross-References. Hospital authority, charter amendment not necessary to form, §7-57-106.

Law Reviews.

Local Government — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Gilbert Merritt, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 800 (1963).

7-1-103. Consolidation of functions.

Each county in this state, without regard to population, and the municipal corporations within such county, may consolidate all, or substantially all, of their governmental and corporate functions in the manner and with the consequences provided in this chapter. The consolidation, when complete, shall result in the creation and establishment of a new metropolitan government to perform all, or substantially all, of the governmental and corporate functions previously performed by the county and by the municipal corporations, the voters of which approve the consolidation.

Nothing contained in this section, or any other law, except § 7-1-112(d), shall be construed to prohibit a municipal corporation that lies in two (2) or more counties from consolidating its governmental and corporate functions with the county in which the majority of its territory lies.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 3; 1963, ch. 97, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3703; Acts 1988, ch. 911, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1962 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 649 (1963).

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

7-1-104. Creation of municipality or public service district after charter commission created.

When a metropolitan government charter commission is created, as provided in §7-2-101, no municipality and no public service district, including, but not limited to, a utility district, sanitary district or school district, shall thereafter be created in the county proposed to be included in such consolidation, unless and until the proposed charter of metropolitan government shall have been rejected by voters in a referendum election as provided in §7-2-106, or unless and until a charter has been adopted by the voters in a referendum election as provided in §7-2-106 with provisions permitting such municipalities or public service districts as described in §7-1-103.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 15; 1963, ch. 256, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3716.

Cross-References. Special service districts authorized, §7-2-108.

7-1-105. Civil districts.

When a metropolitan government is created and established within a county, there shall then be and continue only two (2) civil districts, one (1) consisting of the area embraced in the urban services district and the other consisting of the area of the county other than the urban services district.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 20; T.C.A., § 6-3721.

Cross-References. Urban, general and special service districts, §7-2-108.

7-1-106. Excluded smaller city — Inclusion within metropolitan government.

Any smaller city that has been excluded from a metropolitan government created and established under chapters 1-3 of this title may at any time surrender its municipal charter and become a part of that metropolitan government under such terms and conditions and by such methods and procedures as may be established in the charter of the metropolitan government; provided, that no such consolidation shall become effective until submitted to the registered voters residing within the smaller city and approved by a majority of those voting.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 17; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(62); T.C.A., § 6-3722.

Cross-References. Courts and judicial functions, §7-3-311.

Smaller cities, inclusion in proposed consolidation, §7-2-107.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

7-1-107. Effect on local government simplification statutes.

Nothing in chapters 1-3 of this title shall be construed to alter, abridge or abrogate any provision of §§5-1-113 and49-2-503 or any other law, practice, custom or tradition with respect to contractual, cooperative, unilateral or other devices for simplifying or expediting municipal or county government.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 22; T.C.A., § 6-3723.

7-1-108. Appointment of state officials to public utility boards.

Notwithstanding any law, including any municipal or metropolitan charter to the contrary, the appropriate appointing authority may appoint at least one (1) elected state official to serve as a member of the board of any public utility operated by a municipality or metropolitan government. This section shall only apply to those counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1981, ch. 292, §§ 1, 2.

7-1-109. Elected officials may decline salaries.

Any and all elected public officials in counties that have a metropolitan form of government are authorized to refuse or decline any and all salaries to which they may be entitled under the laws of this state or local ordinances.

Acts 1983, ch. 248, § 1.

7-1-110. Change by ordinance of local governmental entities or functions established by private act.

Any city or county office, department, board, commission, agency or function established by private act prior to the adoption of a metropolitan form of government may be altered, consolidated or abolished by ordinance of the chief legislative body of the metropolitan government if the charter of the metropolitan government does not otherwise provide for the office, department, board, commission, agency or function, and such alteration, consolidation or abolition is not otherwise prohibited by chapters 1-6 of this title or the Constitution of Tennessee.

Acts 1987, ch. 52, § 1.

7-1-111. Electric power boards — Removal of members of certain utility boards — Salary increase.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any electric power board having a customer service greater than two hundred thousand (200,000) active electric meters within a county having a metropolitan form of government shall be composed of at least seven (7) members.

The initial term of office of the two (2) additional members of the electric power board appointed pursuant to this section shall be for a period of five (5) years and three (3) years respectively, with each such appointment to be effective July 1, 1988. Each successive term of office shall be for a period of five (5) years from the date of expiration of the preceding term of office.

Any member of a utility board created under the charter of a metropolitan government that has a population in excess of four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may be removed from office upon a vote of three fourths (¾) of the members of the governing body of such metropolitan government, but only after the assertion of reasons for removal as set forth in a resolution passed by three fourths (¾) of the members of such governing body and only after the holding of a public hearing before such governing body.

No officer of an electric system owned and operated by a metropolitan government shall receive any salary increase that exceeds ten percent (10%) of such officer's base salary for the previous year unless such increase is approved by a unanimous vote of the board.

Acts 1988, ch. 681, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 390, § 1; 1991, ch. 517, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-1-112. Consolidation with county wherein majority of municipal territory lies.

Notwithstanding § 7-2-106, or any other law to the contrary, whenever a municipal corporation that lies in two (2) or more counties is proposed for consolidation with the county in which the majority of its territory lies, any referendum held pursuant to § 7-2-106 shall also include all qualified voters of the municipal corporation, regardless of whether such voters reside or own property outside of the boundaries of the county in which the majority of the municipal corporation's territory lies. The respective county election commissions shall cooperate fully in order to implement this section in an effective, efficient, and timely manner.

Notwithstanding § 2-2-107, or any other law to the contrary, whenever a municipal corporation that lies in two (2) or more counties consolidates its governmental and corporate functions with the county in which the majority of its territory lies, elections for consolidated government representation and school board representation, as well as all other referenda and elections pertaining to the affairs of such consolidated government, shall also include all qualified voters of such municipal corporation, regardless of whether such voters reside or own property outside of the boundaries of the county in which the majority of the municipal corporation's territory lies. The respective election commissions shall cooperate fully in order to implement this section in an effective, efficient, and timely manner.

Whenever a municipal corporation that lies in two (2) or more counties consolidates its governmental and corporate functions with the county in which the majority of its territory lies, the urban services tax prescribed pursuant to § 7-2-108(a)(5) may be levied throughout the territory of the municipal corporation; however, the general services tax prescribed pursuant to § 7-2-108(a)(5) shall not be levied in any portion of the territory of the municipal corporation that lies outside of the boundaries of such county.

This section and §§ 7-1-102(d) and 7-1-103(b) do not apply in counties with populations according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census of:

not less than nor more than

19,650 19,725

26,400 26,500

28,250 28,300

28,650 28,660

32,760 32,800

32,850 32,950

37,000 37,100

49,400 49,500

58,075 58,175

84,000 84,100

85,725 85,825

This section and §§ 7-1-102(d) and 7-1-103(b) do not apply in counties having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1988, ch. 911, §§ 3-5, 7-12.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Assuming that the majority of the territory of a city is in one county, that county can establish a metropolitan government to include the city and the remaining parts of the county, OAG 01-17, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/01).

A metropolitan government may levy an urban services tax, but not a general services tax, on parcels located within the largest city but outside the county, OAG 01-17, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/01).